Washington statutes.
RCW 44.05.120

Reconvening of commission to modify plan.

(1) If a commission has ceased to exist, the legislature may, upon an affirmative vote in each house of two-thirds of the members elected or appointed thereto, adopt legislation reconvening the commission for the purpose of modifying the redistricting plan.

(2) RCW 44.05.050 governs the eligibility of persons to serve on the reconvened commission. A vacancy involving a voting member of the reconvened commission shall be filled by the person who made the initial appointment, or their successor, within fifteen days after the effective date of the legislation reconvening the commission. A vacancy involving the nonvoting member of the commission shall be filled by an affirmative vote of at lease [least] three of four voting members, within fifteen days after all other vacancies are filled or, if no other vacancies exist, within fifteen days after the effective date of the legislation reconvening the commission. A subsequent vacancy on a reconvened commission shall be filled by the person or persons who made the initial appointment, or their successor, within fifteen days after the vacancy occurs. If any appointing authority fails to make a required appointment within the time limitations established by this subsection, within five days after that date the supreme court shall make the required appointment.

(3) The provisions of RCW 44.05.070 and 44.05.080 are applicable if a commission is reconvened under this section.

(4) The commission shall complete the modification to the redistricting plan as soon as possible, but no later than sixty days after the effective date of the legislation reconvening the commission. At least three of the voting members shall approve the modification to the redistricting plan.

(5) Following approval of a modification to the redistricting plan by the commission, the legislature has the next thirty days during any regular or special session to amend the commission's modification. Any amendment by the legislature must be approved by an affirmative vote in each house of two-thirds of the members elected or appointed thereto. No amendment by the legislature may include more than two percent of the population of any legislative or congressional district contained in the commission's modification.

(6) The commission's modification to the redistricting plan, with any amendments approved by the legislature, shall be final upon approval of the amendments or after expiration of the time provided for legislative amendment by subsection (5) of this section, whichever occurs first.

(7) Following the period provided by subsection (4) of this section for the commission's approval of a modification to the redistricting plan, the commission shall take all necessary steps to conclude its business and cease operations in accordance with RCW 44.05.110(1). A reconvened commission shall cease to exist ninety days after the effective date of the legislation reconvening the commission, unless the supreme court extends the commission's term.

[ 1983 c 16 s 12.]